Washington statutes.
RCW 43.147.070

PNWER-Net working subgroup—Duties.

The PNWER-Net working subgroup shall have the following duties:

(1) To work with working subgroups from other member states and provinces in an entity known as the PNWER-Net working group to develop PNWER-Net; and

(2) To assist the PNWER-Net working group in developing criteria to ensure that designated member libraries use existing telecommunications infrastructure including the internet.

[ 1998 c 245 s 49; 1993 c 485 s 4.]